District of Columbia statutes.
4-1704.06

LRAP; disbursement of loans.

(a)

The Administrator shall begin to disburse loan repayment assistance within 90 days of the Administrator’s receipt of adequate funds.

(b)

Subject to the availability of appropriations, loan repayment-assistance payments shall be made not less than semiannually to the participant until the repayment of the eligible debt is complete or the participant no longer meets the eligibility requirements set forth in § 4-1704.03.

Sept. 24, 2010, D.C. Law 18-223, § 406
as added Sept. 14, 2011, D.C. Law 19-21, § 3002(b), 58 DCR 6226
This section is referenced in § 4-1704.04.